California statutes. Insurance Code
No insurer authorized to transact financial guaranty insurance shall pay any commission to or make any gift of money, property, or other valuable thing to any employee, agent, or representative of any issuer of any debt instrument or other monetary obligation of any kind which may be insured pursuant to this article or to any trustee or agent of any such issuer, or to any employee, agent, or representative of any underwriter of any issuer of those debt instruments or monetary obligations as an inducement to the purchase of that insurance, nor may, at any time there is in force a policy issued by that insurer insuring those debt instruments or monetary
 obligations, any employee, agent, or representative of the issuer or underwriter receive from or on behalf of that insurer any such payment or gift.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1032, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Other Casualty Insurers on Reserve Basis; Capital Requirements and Permitted Insurances [12124. - 12124.]

12124.

An incorporated insurer that does not issue fire, marine, life, liability, workers’ compensation, common carrier liability, surety, title or mortgage policies but does issue other insurance policies on a reserve basis shall be governed by the paid-in capital and surplus requirements of Sections 700.01 to 700.05, inclusive.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12110 (as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Group and Individual Plans for Legal Insurance [12125. - 12129.]

12125.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, any insurer admitted to transact any class of insurance in this state, other than title insurance, mortgage insurance, or mortgage guaranty insurance, may transact legal insurance if it has a minimum paid-in capital and surplus of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), provided that the paid-in capital shall not be less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), notwithstanding the paid-in capital and surplus requirements of Sections 700.01, 700.02, 10510, and 10511, respectively.

(b) Any insurer not admitted to transact any other class of insurance in this state may be admitted to transact legal insurance if it has the paid-in capital and surplus required by subdivision (a).

(c) As used in this section, “surplus” means the excess of admitted assets over the sum of (1) liabilities for losses reported, expenses, taxes, and all other indebtedness and reinsurance of outstanding risks as provided by law, and either (2) paid-in capital, in the case of an insurer issuing or having outstanding shares of capital stock, or (3) minimum paid-in capital required by this section, in the case of any other insurer.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12120 (as amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12126.

Group legal insurance shall mean that form of legal insurance covering groups of persons as defined in this chapter with or without one or more of their dependents and issued upon one of the following bases:

(a) Under a policy issued to an employer insuring employees of the employer; 

(b) Under a policy issued to a labor union insuring members of the union;

(c) Under a policy issued to the trustees of a fund established by two or more employers in the same industry or by one or more labor unions or by one or more employers and one or more labor unions, which trustees shall be deemed the policyholder insuring employees of the employers or members of the union;

(d) Under a policy issued to any other organization or combination of organizations, incorporated or otherwise, (including professional associations, trade associations, or other organizations) whose members have common concerns or problems, or have joined together as a means for bargaining for a particular position, or have voluntarily formed or become members of an organization designed to perform a service for its members, or any other substantially similar organization, excluding an organization or combination of organizations that is formed or maintained solely for the purposes of obtaining insurance.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12121 (as amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1161) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12127.

Group and individual legal insurance may be offered in this state subject to all the following conditions:

(a) Premium rates shall comply with any pertinent standards in this code, including the standards that rates not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. Rates for group legal insurance shall not be deemed to be unfairly discriminatory because different premiums result for policyholders with like loss exposures but different expense factors, or like expense factors but different loss exposures, so long as the rates reflect the difference with reasonable accuracy. Rates shall not be considered to be unfairly discriminatory if they are averaged broadly among persons insured under a group legal insurance plan.

(b) No policy or certificate of legal insurance may be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless and until a copy of the form thereof has been filed with the commissioner. However, this subdivision shall apply only to an insurer for a two-year period immediately following the date upon which it files its first policy or certificate of legal insurance with the commissioner.

(c) No policy of group legal insurance may be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains a provision that the insurer shall issue to the person in whose name the policy is issued, for delivery to each member of the insured group, a certificate setting forth in a summary form a statement of the essential features of the insurance coverage and to whom benefits thereunder are payable. If dependents are included in the coverage, only one certificate need be issued for each family unit. Any certificates delivered to members of an insured group pursuant to this subdivision shall be required to be “individualized” within the meaning of that term as it is defined by Section 10270.63 only if members of the group contribute to the payment of the legal insurance premiums.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12122 (as amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1161) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12128.

In every group legal insurance plan, the employer, labor union, trustees, or other person to whom a group legal insurance plan policy is issued shall be the policyholder for all purposes of entering into, amending, or terminating any contract of legal insurance, administering any legal insurance plan, and exercising any voting rights to which the policyholder is entitled. If entitled to vote at meetings of the insurer, such policyholder shall be entitled to one vote.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12123 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12129.

The provisions of this chapter shall be enforced by the commissioner, and he may, after notice and public hearing, promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12124 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. MOTOR CLUBS [12140. - 12311.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and Exemptions [12140. - 12159.]

12140.

This part shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) A duly authorized attorney at law acting in the usual course of his profession.

(b) An admitted insurer.

(c) An association of motor carriers.

(d) A person who is directly or indirectly engaged, either as principal or agent, in selling or offering for sale, furnishing, or procuring any of the services described in Section 12148, 12152, or 12153, or miscellaneous service that augments or is incidental to any of those services, but who
 is not directly or indirectly engaged, either as principal or agent, in selling or offering for sale, furnishing, or procuring any other service described in this chapter.

(e) A person who is licensed as a vehicle service contract provider and offering any of the services described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 12800, to the extent that person is providing the services described therein.

(f) A person offering the services described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 12805 to the extent that person is providing the services described therein.

(g) An agreement that promises routine maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   (AB 2354)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12141.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the terms used in this part shall be given the meanings set forth in this chapter, but such meaning shall not, merely by reason of enactment in this chapter, govern the interpretation of any other provision of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12142.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a motor club is a person, directly or indirectly engaged, either as principal or agent, in selling or offering for sale, furnishing or procuring motor club service.

(b) A person who is directly or indirectly engaged, either as principal or agent, in selling or offering for sale, furnishing, or procuring any of the services described in Section 12148, 12152, or 12153, or miscellaneous service that augments or is incidental to any of those services, but who is not directly or indirectly engaged, either as principal or agent, in selling or offering for sale, furnishing, or procuring any other service described in this chapter, is not a motor club.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 88, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12142.5.

The commissioner shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations specifying the types of miscellaneous service permitted under subdivision (d) of Section 12140 and subdivision (b) of Section 12142. The rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, and repealed in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 88, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12143.

A club agent is a person other than the motor club itself, who acts or aids in any manner in the solicitation, delivery, or negotiation of any membership or service contract, or of the renewal or continuance thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

12144.

Motor club service is the rendering or procuring of, or reimbursement for, any of the services defined in this chapter to any person in connection with the ownership, operation, use, or maintenance of a motor vehicle, including a vacation trailer, house or otherwise, or a boat capable of ordinary transportation on a trailer and its trailer, by the person upon any of the following considerations:

(a) The person is or will become a member of the club rendering or furnishing the service.

(b) The person is or will become in any manner affiliated with the club.

(c) The person is or will become entitled to receive membership or other motor club service from the club by virtue of any agreement or understanding with any club.

This section shall not authorize a motor club to furnish any service on a reimbursement basis that constitutes the transaction of insurance. The commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations specifying services that constitute the transaction of insurance for the purposes of this part and which may not be offered on a reimbursement basis. Rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, and repealed in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 248.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12145.

Towing service is the drafting or moving by a motor club of a motor vehicle from one place to another under other power than its own.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12146.

Emergency road service is the adjustment, repair or replacement by a motor club of the equipment, tires or mechanical parts of a motor vehicle so as to permit it to be operated under its own power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12148.

Discount service is an arrangement by a motor club resulting in giving special discounts, rebates or reductions of price on gasoline, oil, repairs, insurance, parts, accessories or service for motor vehicles to holders of service contracts with any such club.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12149.

Financial service is an arrangement by a motor club whereby loans or other advances of money are made to holders of service contracts with any such club.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12150.

(a) Buying and selling service is an arrangement by a motor club whereby the holder of a service contract with a motor club is aided in any way in the purchase or sale of an automobile.

(b) (1) If a motor club offers a service that refers members to a new motor vehicle dealer for the purchase of a new motor vehicle, and the dealer pays the motor club any compensation, including, but not limited to, an advertising, promotional, or marketing fee, any advertisement of that service shall clearly and conspicuously disclose that the dealer has paid the fee and shall have the following statement: “All new cars arranged for sale are subject to availability and a price prearranged with the selling franchised new car dealer.”

(2) In a printed advertisement, the disclosures required by paragraph (1) shall be in not less than 10-point bold type and shall be textually segregated from the other portions of the advertisement.

(3) The disclosures required by paragraph (1) do not apply to general advertisements of a motor club that merely list an auto buying service as one of several services offered by the motor club and that do not provide any details of the auto buying service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1253, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12151.

Theft service is an act by a motor club for the purpose of locating, identifying or recovering a stolen or missing motor vehicle owned or controlled by the holder of a service contract with any such club or for the purpose of detecting or apprehending the person guilty of the theft.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12152.

Map service is the furnishing by a motor club of road maps without cost to holders of service contracts with any such club.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12153.

Travel service is the furnishing by a motor club of touring and travel aids and assistance, and may include any or all of the following:

(a) Road maps, touring guides, directories of accommodations for travelers, club periodicals, travel information, magazines, and brochures.

(b) Procuring travel tickets of all kinds and reservations for accommodations in connections therewith.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12154.

Claim adjustment service is an act by a motor club for the purpose of adjusting claims on behalf of the holder of a service contract with any such club, when such claim results from injury or damage to person or property arising out of an accident, in connection with the ownership, maintenance, operation and use of a motor vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12155.

License service is the rendering of assistance by a motor club to any person in obtaining:

(a) Registration of a motor vehicle with the State.

(b) A driver’s license.

(c) A transfer of legal or registered ownership upon the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

12156.

Insurance service is the selling or giving, with a service contract or as a result of membership in or affiliation with a motor club, of a policy of insurance covering liability or loss by the holder resulting from injury or damage to person or property arising out of an accident, such liability or loss being the consequence of the ownership, maintenance, operation, or use of a motor vehicle.

Insurance service also includes the selling or giving with a service contract or as a result of membership in or affiliation with a motor club, of a policy of insurance, or a certificate under a master policy in which the club is the master policyholder, covering the club member, or any member of his family, for loss, other than loss of time, from accidental injury from any cause or accidental death from any cause. For such purpose any certificated motor club is deemed to be an “association” within the meaning of Section 10270.5 and the club members and members of their families are deemed to be members of such association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12157.

Any act by a motor club for the purpose of rendering a service defined in this chapter constitutes such service, whether or not the service as defined is completed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12158.

A service contract is a written agreement whereby any person promises for a consideration to render, furnish or procure motor club service for any other person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12159.

Miscellaneous service means any other service which may be furnished and which augments or is incidental to any service performed by the club as authorized under the provisions of this chapter or any other service which is of assistance and is beneficial to its members and is feasible for the club to render.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Certificate of Authority [12160. - 12170.]

12160.

(a) A person shall not render or agree to render motor club service in this state without first obtaining from the commissioner a certificate of authority to act as a motor club.

(b) The issuance, sale, or offer for sale in this state of securities of its own issue by any motor club shall be subject to the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code the same as if motor clubs were included in Section 826 thereof, and any such club shall not be subject to the Corporate Securities Law in the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12161.

Application for a certificate of authority shall be made on a form prescribed by the commissioner, accompanied by a filing fee of four thousand nine hundred thirty-nine dollars ($4,939). That certificate shall not be granted until the applicant conforms to the requirements of this part and the laws of this state prerequisite to its issue. After the issuance, the holder shall continue to comply with the requirements of this part and the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 74.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12162.

The commissioner shall not issue a certificate of authority to any motor club until:

(a) It files with him or her the following:

(1) A formal application for the certificate in that form and detail as the commissioner requires, executed under oath by its president or other principal officer.

(2) A certified copy of its charter or articles of incorporation and its bylaws, if any.

(3) A copy of its latest financial statement, or report of independent audit as the commissioner may require; or, in the event neither is available, its most recent operating
 statement and balance sheet. Any financial statement, audit, operating and balance sheet shall be verified by the person compiling or making the same and by an executive officer of the applicant.

(4) If it is a foreign corporation, a certificate from its domiciliary state regulatory authority executed not more than 30 days before the filing of its application that it is duly authorized to do a motor club business in that state.

(5) An explanation of its plan of doing business, and copies of the following: its application for membership; the proposed membership certificate or identification card; any proposed addendum thereto; any individual insurance policy and any group master policy and individual certificates thereunder to be offered; any service contract to be issued.

(6) Other information as the commissioner may
 find necessary in order to determine the applicant’s qualifications.

(b) It first deposits security with the commissioner in one of the following forms:

(1) Securities of the kinds prescribed by this code for capital fund investments by stock insurers and approved by the commissioner, in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) based on par value or market value, whichever is less. The making, maintenance and withdrawal of those deposits and the substitution of securities therein shall be governed by Article 11 (commencing with Section 939) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(2) A surety bond on a form prescribed by the Attorney General of this state, executed by an admitted surety insurer in the penal sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) It pays to the commissioner an annual license fee of four hundred twenty-four dollars ($424).

(d) Its name is approved by the commissioner under Section 881, which applies to motor clubs.

(e) It proves by affidavits of its officers, directors, managers, and individual owners of more than 10 percent on a form prescribed by the commissioner that it is not disqualified under Section 704.5.

(f) It satisfies the commissioner it is qualified as respects each of the subjects enumerated in subdivisions (b), (c), (e), (f), (h), (i), and (j) of Section 717, when those subjects are read in the sense of protection to its members instead of policyholders.

(g) It is a separate legal entity capable of being examined by the commissioner as provided in
 this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 75.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12162.5.

All motor clubs applying for a certificate of authority to act as a motor club in this state shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner that such club has a net worth of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). For the purposes of Sections 12162.5 and 12162.6, net worth is defined as the excess of total assets over total liabilities. Such net worth shall be maintained at all times as a condition for the continuance of its certificate of authority to act as a motor club in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12162.6.

(a) A motor club holding a certificate of authority to act as a motor club granted prior to January 1, 1992, may continue to retain the certificate until July 1, 1996, without complying with the increased minimum net worth requirement of Section 12162.5.

(b) A motor club shall be deemed to be insolvent and subject to Section 12164 proceedings whenever its net worth is less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and it fails to comply with one of these two conditions:

(1) An audit by an independent certified public accountant with an audit report prepared by the certified public accountant and filed with the commissioner no later than June 30 of the year following the year covered by the audit.

(2) A demonstration to the satisfaction of the commissioner, on a quarterly basis, of an amount of liquid assets sufficient to satisfy its current liabilities to members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 15, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12162.7.

For purposes of this article, “liquid assets” means cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities readily convertible into cash. Liquid assets also include bonds, stocks, certificates of deposit, negotiable short-term instruments, service members’ dues receivable not over 90 days, receivables due from affiliates not over 90 days, acquisition costs deferred not over 90 days, federal income tax recoverables, and interest and dividends due and accrued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 15, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12162.8.

If any portion of the audit report required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12162.6 includes a qualified opinion as to the financial condition of the motor club or its ability to exist as a going concern, the motor club shall be considered materially deficient under Section 717, and subject to Section 12164. Similarly, if a motor club qualifying under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12162.6 fails to demonstrate to the commissioner an amount of liquid assets sufficient to satisfy its current liabilities to members, it shall be considered materially deficient under Section 717 and subject to Section 12164.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12163.

(a) The security required by subdivision (b) of Section 12162 shall thereafter be continuously maintained by a motor club in one of the forms prescribed. Failure of a motor club so to maintain the same shall be cause for revoking its certificate of authority.

(b) Such security shall be for the protection, use, and benefit of all persons whose applications for membership in a motor club have been accepted by such club or its representative and of this state as respects fees, fines, penalties, and taxes. Such security shall be subject to the following conditions, and, if a bond, shall be expressly so conditioned:

1. The club shall faithfully furnish and render to all persons whose applications for membership have been accepted any and all of the motor club benefits and services sold or offered for sale by it.

2. The club will faithfully conform to all provisions of law of the state pertaining to the sale and rendering of “motor club service” as defined and provided in Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2 of this code.

3. The club will promptly pay all fees, fines, penalties, and taxes which may be levied against it under authority of law.

4. If the club ceases to do business in this state as a motor club, it shall comply with the appropriate withdrawal procedure.

(c) Any person defrauded or injured by any wrongful act, misrepresentation, or failure on the part of the club with respect to the selling or rendering of any of its benefits or services may bring suit on the bond, if the security be a bond, in his own name. The commissioner may bring suit on such bond. If the security be a deposit of securities, any such a person or the commissioner may levy upon the same in execution of a judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12164.

(a) The commissioner may revoke or suspend the certificate of authority of a motor club whenever, after a hearing in accordance with the procedure provided in Section 701, he finds that any of the following circumstances exist:

1. The club has violated any provision of this part.

2. It or its officers refuse to submit to an examination, as provided for in Section 12169.

3. It is transacting business fraudulently.

4. It is no longer able to qualify for issuance to it of a certificate of authority as a motor club.

(b) The commissioner may give notice of such revocation or suspension to the public in such manner as he deems proper.

(c) All of the provisions of Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code not inconsistent with this part shall apply to motor clubs.

For the purpose of this part, “insolvency” means that a club’s assets are less than its liabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12165.

Subject to the annual fee provisions herein, every certificate of authority issued or held under this part shall be for an indefinite term and, unless sooner revoked by the commissioner, shall terminate upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Upon the holder’s ceasing to exist as a separate entity.

(b) Upon the winding up, or dissolution, or expiration, or forfeiture of the holder’s corporate existence.

(c) Upon completion of the withdrawal procedure prescribed by Article 15 (commencing with Section 1070) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code and surrender by the holder of its certificate of authority and cancellation of the same by the commissioner. All provisions of such article not inconsistent with this part shall apply.

(d) Upon the entry of a final court order in a proceeding under said Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12166.

Notwithstanding the preceding provisions for a certificate of authority of indefinite term, each holder of a certificate of authority under this chapter shall owe and pay in advance to the commissioner an annual fee of two hundred five dollars ($205) on account of that certificate of authority until its final termination or revocation. That fee shall be for annual periods commencing on July 1 of each year and ending on June 30 of each year and shall be due on each March 1 and shall be delinquent on and after each April 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 76.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12167.

Qualification of a motor club for a certificate of authority under this part does not require prior qualification with the Secretary of State under the Corporations Code for an intrastate business, but the issuance to it of a certificate of authority under this part does not relieve such foreign applicant of any duty to qualify with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Corporations Code before transacting intrastate business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12168.

Annually on or before March 1 of each year, copies of any instruments making any changes in articles of incorporation, bylaws, and membership certificate or identification card or service contract required by this part to be filed with the application for admission shall be filed with the commissioner. In the case of articles of incorporation, an amendment or certificate of amendment shall be certified by the official custodian of the original as a true copy of the same on file in his or her office. Amended bylaws or other papers shall be certified by the corporation secretary over the corporate seal to be true copies of the same currently adopted. The commissioner shall require the payment of fifty dollars ($50) for each annual filing of amended documents or papers pursuant to this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 77.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12169.

(a) Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that a motor club is insolvent or is transacting its business in a fraudulent manner, he may demand from the club a statement under oath setting forth its assets and liabilities. He may, for the purpose of verifying the correctness of such statement, examine the books and affairs of the club.

(b) If such statement is not furnished within 20 days from the time of such demand by the commissioner, or if, upon the examination of such records, the statement furnished or any record examined is found to contain any willful misstatement of fact, the expense of the examination shall be paid by the motor club.

(c) Whenever any foreign motor club applies for admission, the commissioner may make, or cause to be made by the motor club regulatory authority of its domiciliary state, an examination of the applicant’s motor club business and affairs. Whenever such an examination is made, all of the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 730) Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code not inconsistent with this part shall be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

12170.

Motor clubs certificated on the effective date of this chapter shall not be required to be recertificated, but thereafter shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall be issued continuous certificates of authority subject to the conditions provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Service Contract [12250. - 12256.]

12250.

A service contract shall not be executed, issued or delivered in this State until the form thereof is approved in writing by the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12251.

Every service contract executed, issued or delivered in this State shall be made in duplicate and shall be dated and signed by the motor club issuing it. Such contract shall be countersigned by a duly authorized agent of the club, and by the party purchasing the contract. One copy of the contract shall be kept by the club and the other copy shall be delivered to the purchasing party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12252.

A service contract shall not be executed, issued or delivered in this State unless it contains the following:

(a) The exact corporate or other name of the club.

(b) The exact location of its home office and of its usual place of business in this State, giving street number and city.

(c) A provision that the contract may be canceled at any time by either the club or the holder, and that the holder will, if he has actually paid the consideration, thereupon be entitled to the unused portion of the consideration paid for such contract, calculated on a pro rata basis over the period of the contract, without any deductions.

(d) A provision plainly specifying:

(1) The services promised.

(2) That the holder will not be required to pay any sum, in addition to the amount specified in the contract, for any services thus specified.

(3) The territory wherein such services are to be rendered.

(4) The date when such service will commence.

(e) A statement in not less than fourteen point modern type at the head of said contract stating, “This is not an insurance contract.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12253.

A person shall not solicit or aid in the solicitation of another person to purchase a service contract issued by a club not having a certificate of authority procured pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12254.

A club or an officer or agent thereof shall not in any manner misrepresent the terms, benefits or privileges of any service contract issued or to be issued by it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12255.

Any service contract made, issued or delivered contrary to any provision of this part shall nevertheless be valid and binding on the club.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12256.

Any motor club may elect not to execute, issue, or deliver service contracts in this state. A club may distribute brochures, prospectuses, or advertisements which are not contracts. Such materials may be issued or delivered without prior approval of the commissioner.

If a club does not use service contracts it shall execute, issue, and deliver membership cards, tokens, or other indicia of membership to its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Agents [12280. - 12281.]

12280.

A club agent doing business in this State shall not execute, issue or deliver any service contract to any person owning or operating motor vehicles without first obtaining a license from the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12280.2.

(a) The fee for filing application for license as motor club agent is eighty-five dollars ($85).

(b) Property broker-agents, casualty broker-agents, personal lines broker-agents, and limited lines automobile insurance agents licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1 need not be licensed to act as motor club agents under this chapter.

(c) This section shall not permit a motor club agent to have a certificate of convenience nor a nonresident license, but shall require only club appointments, and shall not require the keeping of records or fiduciary accounts. Appropriate licenses and license applications may be prescribed by
 the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 78.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12281.

Without first obtaining such license, a club agent shall not collect or receive from any person, in advance of the execution, issuance or delivery of any such service contract, any money or other thing of value upon any promise or agreement to execute, issue or deliver any such service contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Penalties [12311. - 12311.]

12311.

Any person violating any provisions of this part is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. INSURANCE COVERING LAND [12340. - 12661.]



  CHAPTER 1. Title Insurance [12340. - 12418.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [12340. - 12342.]

12340.

The definitions set forth in this article shall govern the construction of the terms used in this chapter, but shall not affect any other provisions of this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.1.

“Title insurance” means insuring, guaranteeing or indemnifying owners of real or personal property or the holders of liens or encumbrances thereon or others interested therein against loss or damage suffered by reason of:

(a) Liens or encumbrances on, or defects in the title to said property;

(b) Invalidity or unenforceability of any liens or encumbrances thereon; or

(c) Incorrectness of searches relating to the title to real or personal property.
